Hawaii statutes.
§48E-17 Status of special purpose revenue
bonds under Uniform Commercial Code. Notwithstanding any of the provisions
of this chapter or any recitals in any special purpose revenue bonds issued
under this chapter, all such special purpose revenue bonds shall be deemed to
be investment securities under the Uniform Commercial Code, chapter 490,
subject only to the provisions of the special purpose revenue bonds pertaining
to registration. [L 1983, c 237, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next